Massachusetts, session 194th, H4448.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 143 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is hereby
amended by inserting after section 100 the following new sections:-
Section 101. Any employer in the construction industry that contracts with clients or
customers in residential, commercial, or public works projects, and whose business is subject to
oversight by the United States Occupational Safety and Health Administration, shall have its
employees receive no less than 10 hours of Occupational Safety and Health Administration
training. Employers that contract independent contractors shall require the independent
contractor to provide evidence of completing at least 10 hours of a training course approved by
the Occupational Safety and Health Administration.
Any employer who utilizes employees without the required training shall be fined $1,500
in the first instance, $2,500 in a second instance and $5,000 for each subsequent instance. Should
an employee or contractor die as a violation of this section or a death is found in violation the
United States Occupational Safety and Health Administration shall be fined $25,000; provided
of 2

that no fines shall be issued until the investigation is completed as to the cause of death. The
board shall keep a list of violations of this section and violations publicly available from United
States Occupational Safety and Health Administration and the reason for a violation available
and ready for access by the public.
The board shall promulgate rules and regulations on this section, including but not
limited to, providing a list of available training providers, providing when employees should be
trained again after the initial training and a way for consumers and employees to report
violations to the board.
Section 102. The board shall promulgate guidelines by which cities and towns may issue
permits to employers in the construction industry that violates section 101 or the United States
Occupational Safety and Health Administration, and have been investigated and fines and
penalties issued against them. This law shall not restrict routine home maintenance performed by
homeowners. Projects that are completed for less than or equal to $25,000.00 remain exempt
from this law.
of 2